Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 1 Acceptance of Gifts

37-1-1.
Acceptance by director of administration — Report to general assembly.

Whenever any grant, devise, bequest, donation, gift, or assignment of money, bonds, or choses in action, or any property, real or personal, shall be made to this state, the director of administration is hereby authorized, if he or she shall deem it for the best interests of the state, to receive and accept the same so that the right and title to the same shall pass to this state; and those bonds, notes, or choses in action, or the proceeds thereof, and all other property, or thing of value, so received by the state, shall be reported by the governor to the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 1910, ch. 527, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 20, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 6, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

37-1-1

; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 22, § 1.